Maine, session 132, LD323.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, STATE BOARD OF
State Board of Education 0614
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for the State Board of Education to contract for staffing
services. Funds may not be used to establish or fund a permanent position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $25,000
Page 1 - 132LR0911(05)